Illinois, session 104th, SB2822.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Digital Purchase Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Blockchain-based asset" means a digital good whose 8ownership and access are verified through a decentralized 9ledger technology and that cannot be unilaterally revoked or 10altered by the seller after the transaction.11    "Clear and conspicuous" means in a manner that clearly 12calls attention to the language. "Clear and conspicuous" 13includes using larger type than the surrounding text, using 14contrasting type, font, or color to the surrounding text of 15the same size, and setting off the surrounding text by using 16symbols or other marks.17    "Digital application or game" means an application or game 18that a person accesses and manipulates using a specialized 19electronic gaming device, computer, mobile device, tablet, or 20other device with a display screen, including any add-ons or 21additional content for that application or game.22    "Digital audio work" means a work that results from the 23fixation of a series of musical, spoken, or other sounds that   SB2822 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16965 SPS 30379 b1are transferred electronically, including prerecorded or live 2songs, music, oral readings of books or other written 3materials, speeches, ringtones, and other sound recordings.4    "Digital audiovisual work" means a series of related 5images and accompanying sounds that, when shown in succession, 6impart an impression of motion, including motion pictures, 7musicals, videos, news and entertainment programs, and live 8events.9    "Digital book" means a work that is generally recognized, 10in the ordinary and usual sense, as a book of fiction or 11nonfiction and that is transferred electronically.12    "Digital code" means a code that provides the person who 13holds the code a right to obtain an additional digital good or 14a digital audiovisual work, digital audio work, or digital 15book that may be obtained by any means, including tangible 16forms and electronic mail, regardless of whether the code is 17designated as song code, video code, or book code. "Digital 18code" includes: (i) codes that are used to access or obtain any 19specified digital goods or any additional digital goods that 20have been previously purchased; and (ii) promotion cards or 21codes that are purchased by a retailer or other business 22entity for use by the retailer's or entity's customers. 23    "Digital good" includes, whether electronically or 24digitally delivered or accessed, a digital audiovisual work, 25digital audio work, digital book, digital code, or digital 26application or game. "Digital good" does not include a cable   SB2822 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16965 SPS 30379 b1television service; satellite relay television service; 2Internet access service; telecommunications service; or any 3other distribution of television, video, radio, Internet, or 4telecommunications service. "Digital good" also does not 5include any service that is clearly and conspicuously 6identified at the point of sale as being a monthly 7subscription service. 8    Section 10. Required disclosures. 9    (a) It is unlawful for a seller of a digital good to offer 10for sale or advertise a digital good to a consumer using the 11terms "buy" or "purchase" or any other term that a reasonable 12person would understand to confer an ownership interest in 13that digital good unless either:14        (1) at the time of each transaction, the seller:15            (A) provides to the consumer a complete list of 16        restrictions and conditions for the license, including 17        any circumstances under which access may be revoked; 18        and19            (B) receives an affirmative acknowledgment from 20        the consumer that the consumer received from the 21        seller:22                (i) a license to access the digital good; and23                (ii) a notice that the seller may unilaterally 24            revoke access to the digital good if the seller no 25            longer holds the right to the digital good; or  SB2822 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16965 SPS 30379 b1        (2) before executing each transaction, the seller 2    provides to the consumer a clear and conspicuous statement 3    that: (i) states in plain language that buying or 4    purchasing a digital good is a license; and (ii) includes 5    a hyperlink, quick response code, URL, or other similar 6    method to access the terms and conditions of the license.7    Any affirmative acknowledgment from the consumer or clear 8and conspicuous statement required under this subsection shall 9be distinct and separate from any other terms and conditions 10of the transaction.11    (b) This Section does not require a person to download a 12digital good or prohibit a person from storing a digital good 13on a server for access through the Internet. 14    Section 15. Limitations. This Act does not apply to:15        (1) a subscription-based service that advertises or 16    offers for sale access to any digital good solely for the 17    duration of the subscription;18        (2) a digital good that is advertised or offered to a 19    person without monetary consideration;20        (3) a digital good that is advertised or offered to a 21    person and that the seller cannot revoke access to after 22    the transaction, including making the digital good 23    available at the time of purchase for permanent offline 24    download to an external storage source to be used without 25    a connection to the Internet;  SB2822 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16965 SPS 30379 b1        (4) a blockchain-based asset, including a non-fungible 2    token, where ownership is decentralized and not subject to 3    unilateral revocation by the seller;4        (5) an educational or noncommercial digital good that 5    is provided by a public library, educational institution, 6    or open-source platform; or7        (6) content owners or licensors whose digital goods 8    are sold by a third party. 9    Section 20. Enforcement. A violation of any of the 10provisions of this Act is an unlawful practice under the 11Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business Practices Act. All 12remedies, penalties, and authority granted to the Attorney 13General by that Act shall be available to the Attorney General 14for the enforcement of this Act. 15    Section 90. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 16Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2MMMM as follows: 17    (815 ILCS 505/2MMMM new)18    Sec. 2MMMM. Violations of the Digital Purchase 19Transparency Act. Any person who violates the Digital Purchase 20Transparency Act commits an unlawful practice within the 21meaning of this Act.